Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.17
Commercial fertilizer or beneficial substance; act; violations; penalty.

Any person violating any provisions of the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act or the rules and regulations issued thereunder, or who shall impede, obstruct, hinder, or otherwise prevent or attempt to prevent the director in the performance of his or her duty pursuant to the act, shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 17, p. 1045;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 18;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 283;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 36;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 25.
March 17, 2026